Utah statutes.
26-21a-205.   Department duties.

The department shall:

(1)  enforce rules established under this part;

(2)  authorize qualified department agents to conduct inspections of mammogram facilities under department rules;

(3)  collect and credit fees for certification under Section 63J-1-504; and

(4)  provide necessary administrative and staff support to the committee.

